Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 10. Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety.

§ 9.1-184.
Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety created; duties.

From such funds as may be appropriated, the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety (the Center) is hereby established within the Department. The Center shall:

Provide training for Virginia public school personnel in school safety, on evidence-based antibullying tactics based on the definition of bullying in § 22.1-276.01, and in the effective identification of students who may be at risk for violent behavior and in need of special services or assistance;

Serve as a resource and referral center for Virginia school divisions by conducting research, sponsoring workshops, and providing information regarding current school safety concerns, such as conflict management and peer mediation, bullying as defined in § 22.1-276.01, school facility design and technology, current state and federal statutory and regulatory school safety requirements, and legal and constitutional issues regarding school safety and individual rights;

Maintain and disseminate information to local school divisions on effective school safety initiatives in Virginia and across the nation;

Develop a case management tool for the collection and reporting of data by threat assessment teams pursuant to § 22.1-79.4;

Collect, analyze, and disseminate various Virginia school safety data, including school safety audit information submitted to it pursuant to § 22.1-279.8, collected by the Department and, in conjunction with the Department of Education, information relating to the activities of school resource officers submitted pursuant to § 22.1-279.10;

Encourage the development of partnerships between the public and private sectors to promote school safety in Virginia;

Provide technical assistance to Virginia school divisions in the development and implementation of initiatives promoting school safety, including threat assessment-based protocols with such funds as may be available for such purpose;

Develop a memorandum of understanding between the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Superintendent of Public Instruction to ensure collaboration and coordination of roles and responsibilities in areas of mutual concern, such as school safety audits and crime prevention;

Provide training for and certification of school security officers, as defined in §

9.1-101

and consistent with §

9.1-110

;

Develop, in conjunction with the Department of State Police, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and the Department of Education, a model critical incident response training program for public school personnel and others providing services to schools that shall also be made available to private schools in the Commonwealth;

In consultation with the Department of Education, provide schools with a model policy for the establishment of threat assessment teams, including procedures for the assessment of and intervention with students whose behavior poses a threat to the safety of school staff or students; and

Develop a model memorandum of understanding setting forth the respective roles and responsibilities of local school boards and local law-enforcement agencies regarding the use of school resource officers. Such model memorandum of understanding may be used by local school boards and local law-enforcement agencies to satisfy the requirements of subsection A of § 22.1-280.2:3.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Center and, upon request, assist the Center in the performance of its duties and responsibilities.

History.

2000, c. 519, § 9-173.21; 2001, cc. 436, 440, 844; 2002, cc. 836, 868; 2012, cc. 281, 433; 2013, cc. 676, 710; 2014, cc. 7, 92, 158; 2019, cc. 39, 455, 456, 502; 2020, cc. 169, 1039; 2022, c. 769.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 519, cl. 2, provided: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the 2000 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2000 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor.” An appropriation was made in the 2000-2002 budget.

Acts 2001, cc. 436 and 440 amended former § 9-173.21, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, cc. 436 and 440 have been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendments by cc. 436 and 440 are identical, and inserted “submitted to it pursuant to § 22.1-278.1 [now § 22.1-279.8]” in subdivision A 4, and inserted “development and” in subdivision A 6.

Acts 2002, cc. 836 and 868, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2003, c. 617, cls. 1 and 2, provide: “That, with such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose, the training and employment standards required by §

9.1-184

shall be applicable to persons employed as school security officers on and after September 15, 2004.”

Acts 2019, c. 719 provides: “§ 1. The Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety (the Center), shall convene a work group to develop guidelines and best practices for the sharing of information between a local school board or public institution of higher education and law enforcement regarding a student whose behavior may pose a threat to the safety of a school or institution or the community, including information regarding such student’s disciplinary history, medical conditions, or other relevant characteristics. Such guidelines and best practices shall seek to balance the interests of safety and student privacy and shall be consistent with the provisions of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.), as applicable. Such work group shall include representatives from the Department of Education, the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Office of the Attorney General, the Virginia School Boards Association, the Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police, the Virginia Sheriffs’ Association, the Virginia Association of Campus Law Enforcement Administrators, and other interested shareholders. The Center shall develop such guidelines and best practices, report to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health, and make such guidelines available to local school boards, public institutions of higher education, law enforcement, and the public by October 1, 2019.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 836 and 868 are identical, and deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 6; inserted “and” at the end of subdivision A 7; and inserted subdivision A 8. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 281 and 433 are identical, and substituted “school safety, on evidence-based antibullying tactics, and in the effective identification” for “school safety, and the effective identification” in subdivision A 1, inserted “bullying,” in subdivision A 2, substituted “Director” for “Commissioner” in subdivision A 7, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 676 and 710 are nearly identical, and added “including threat assessment-based protocols with such funds as may be available for such purpose” at the end of paragraph A 6; deleted “and” at the end of paragraph A 7; and added paragraphs A 9 and A 10.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 7 and 158 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety” for “Virginia Center for School Safety.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 92, in subdivision A 1, inserted “based on the definition of bullying in § 22.1-276.01”; and in subdivision A 2, inserted “as defined in § 22.1-276.01.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 39 and 456 are identical, added subdivision A 4, and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 455 and 502 are identical, and added subdivision A 12; and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 169 and 1039 are identical, and inserted “and, in conjunction with the Department of Education, information relating to the activities of school resource officers submitted pursuant to § 22.1-279.10” in subdivision A 5.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 769, inserted “subsection A of” in subdivision A 12.

Law Review.

For Comment, “Spelling out LGBT: Enumerating Sexual Orientation in Virginia’s Anti-Bullying Law,” 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1373 (2013).